Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,115
Report or finding admissible.

A written report or finding of facts prepared by an expert not being a party to the cause, nor an employee of a party, except for the purpose of making such report or finding, nor financially interested in the result of the controversy, and containing the conclusions resulting wholly or partly from written information furnished by the cooperation of several persons acting for a common purpose, shall, insofar as the same may be relevant, be admissible when testified to by the person, or one of the persons, making such report or finding without calling as witnesses the persons furnishing the information, and without producing the books or other writings on which the report or finding is based, if, in the opinion of the court, no substantial injustice will be done the opposite party.

Laws 1951, c. 57, § 1, p. 190.

An offer of a composite record under this act is prima facie sufficient if a proper foundation is laid. Gateway Bank v. Department of Banking, 192 Neb. 109, 219 N.W.2d 211 (1974).

Report of results of blood test was admissible in evidence when supported by testimony of doctor who supervised the test. Houghton v. Houghton, 179 Neb. 275, 137 N.W.2d 861 (1965).

Application of statute doubted, but sufficient compliance shown. Chicago & N. W. Ry. Co. v. City of Norfolk, 157 Neb. 594, 60 N.W.2d 662 (1953).